Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4975.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 198.01, is amended to read: 198.01 VETERANS HOME; ELIGIBILITY OF VETERANS. new text begin (a) new text end The Minnesota veterans homes shall provide nursing care and related health and social services for veterans and their spouses who meet eligibility and admission requirements of the Minnesota veterans homes. The commissioner may not close a veterans home unless closure of the home is specifically authorized or required by a law enacted after July 1, 2015. new text begin (b)new text end The word "veteran" as used in this section deleted text begin has the meaning provided indeleted text end new text begin includes:new text end new text begin (1) a person who qualifies as a veteran under new text end section 197.447deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) a person who served on active duty, as defined under United States Code, title 38, section 101.21(B), as a commissioned officer of the Public Health Service, and (i) who was separated under honorable conditions after having served on active duty for 181 consecutive days or by reason of disability incurred while serving on active duty; or (ii) who has met the minimum active duty requirement established in Code of Federal Regulations, title 38, section 3.12a; and new text end new text begin (3) a person who served on active duty, as defined under United States Code, title 38, section 101.21(C), as a commissioned officer of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration and (i) who was separated under honorable conditions after having served on active duty for 181 consecutive days or by reason of disability incurred while serving on active duty; or (ii) who has met the minimum active duty requirement established in Code of Federal Regulations, title 38, section 3.12a. new text end